Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.580

Mandatory assignment of retirement benefits—Order—Contents.

(1)(a) The mandatory benefits assignment order issued pursuant to RCW 41.50.570 and directed at periodic retirement benefits shall include:

(i) The maximum amount of current spousal maintenance to be withheld from the obligor's periodic retirement benefits each month;

(ii) The total amount of the arrearage judgments previously entered by the court, if any, together with interest, if any; and

(iii) The maximum amount to be withheld from the obligor's periodic retirement payments each month to satisfy the arrearage judgments specified in (a)(ii) of this subsection.

(b) The total amount to be withheld from the obligor's periodic retirement payments each month pursuant to a mandatory benefits assignment order shall not exceed fifty percent of the disposable benefits of the obligor. If the amounts to be paid toward the arrearage are specified in the assignment order, then the maximum amount to be withheld is the sum of the current maintenance ordered and the amount ordered to be paid toward the arrearage, or fifty percent of the disposable benefits of the obligor, whichever is less.

(c) Fifty percent of the disposable benefits of the obligor are exempt from collection under the assignment order, and may be disbursed by the department to the obligor. The provisions of RCW 6.27.150 do not apply to mandatory benefits assignment orders under this chapter.

(2)(a) A mandatory benefits assignment order issued pursuant to RCW 41.50.570 and directed at a withdrawal of accumulated contributions shall include:

(i) The maximum amount of current spousal maintenance to be withheld from the obligor's accumulated contributions;

(ii) The total amount of the arrearage judgments for spousal maintenance payments entered by the court, if any, together with interest, if any; and

(iii) The amount to be withheld from the obligor's withdrawal of accumulated contributions to satisfy the current maintenance obligation and the arrearage judgments specified in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection;

(b) The total amount to be withheld from the obligor's withdrawal of accumulated contributions may be up to one hundred percent of the disposable benefits of the obligor.

(3) If an obligor is subject to two or more mandatory benefits assignment orders on account of different obligees and if the nonexempt portion of the obligor's benefits is not sufficient to respond fully to all the mandatory benefits assignment orders, the department shall apportion the obligor's nonexempt disposable benefits among the various obligees in proportionate shares to the extent permitted by federal law. Any obligee may seek a court order directing the department to reapportion the obligor's nonexempt disposable earnings upon notice to all interested obligees. The order must specifically supersede the terms of previous mandatory benefits assignment orders the terms of which it alters. Notice shall be by personal service, or in a manner provided by the civil rules of superior court or applicable statute.

[ 1991 c 365 s 7; 1987 c 326 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.